Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 5 Fiduciary Investment Companies

7-1-330.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Fiduciary investment company” means a corporation which is an investment company as defined by the act of Congress entitled “Investment Company Act of 1940” and is incorporated in accordance with Chapter 2 of Title 14 so as to constitute a medium for the investment of funds held by trust institutions and foreign trust institutions in a fiduciary capacity, either alone or with one or more cofiduciaries.

“Foreign trust institution” means any state banking institution or trust company organized under the laws of any state other than Georgia or any national banking association incorporated under the laws of the United States and having its principal office in some state other than Georgia which has trust powers and is authorized to act in a fiduciary capacity under the laws under which it was incorporated.

“Investment adviser” of a fiduciary investment company means:

Any trust institution which, pursuant to contract with a fiduciary investment company possessing the qualifications provided by this part, regularly furnishes advice to such investment company with respect to the desirability of investing in, purchasing, or selling securities or other property or is empowered to determine what securities or other property shall be purchased or sold by such investment company; and

Any person or corporation other than a trust institution, who, pursuant to contract with such trust institution, regularly performs substantially all of such duties undertaken by such trust institution.

“Trust institution” means any trust company or any national bank with its principal office located in this state, authorized to act as a fiduciary.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 515, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 639, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1973, p. 549, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-1501, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

U.S. Code.

The Investment Company Act of 1940, referred to in paragraph (1) of this Code section, is codified as

15 U.S.C. § 80

a-1 et seq.

7-1-331.
Organization; approval by department.

Any one or more trust institutions may cause a fiduciary investment company or companies to be organized and incorporated, but no trust institution or foreign trust institution may own an interest in more than seven fiduciary investment companies. A fiduciary investment company shall not begin business, except to select an investment adviser, until it is approved by the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 515, § 2; Ga. L. 1971, p. 639, § 3; Code 1933, § 41A-1502, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-332.
Incorporation.

Any such fiduciary investment company shall be incorporated under and subject to Chapter 2 of Title 14. The incorporators shall be persons who are officers or directors of the trust institution or institutions causing such fiduciary investment company to be incorporated; and the articles of incorporation shall set forth the name of each trust institution participating in such incorporation and the amount of stock originally subscribed for by each, together with such other facts as are required by Chapter 2 of Title 14.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 515, § 3; Code 1933, § 41A-1503, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-333.
Limitations on investments.

Trust institutions and foreign trust institutions, as defined by this part, acting in a fiduciary capacity and for fiduciary purposes, if exercising due care as a prudent investor, and with the consent of any cofiduciary, may invest and reinvest funds held in such fiduciary capacity in the shares of stock of one or more fiduciary investment companies, except where the will, trust indenture, or other instrument under which such trust institution or foreign trust institution acts prohibits such investment, provided that the fiduciary investment company, by its articles of incorporation issued and granted in conformity with Chapter 2 of Title 14, shall have and possess the corporate powers required by this part and be subject to the limitations set forth by this part; provided, further, that no such trust institution or foreign trust institution shall invest in the stock of a fiduciary investment company on behalf of any estate, trust, or fund administered by such trust institution or foreign trust institution a sum or amount which would result in such estate, trust, or fund having a total investment in such stock in excess of the maximum amount or percentage that might be invested by such estate, trust, or fund, under the regulations of the department in effect at the time of such investment, in any common trust fund having total assets equal to the total assets of the fiduciary investment company as increased by the proposed investment; and no trust institution or foreign trust institution shall invest in the stock of a fiduciary investment company if, immediately after such investment and as a consequence thereof, it would own more than 25 percent of the voting securities of such fiduciary investment company which would then be outstanding.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 515, § 4; Ga. L. 1971, p. 639, § 4; Ga. L. 1973, p. 549, § 2; Code 1933, § 41A-1504, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-334.
Corporate powers; limitations and restrictions.

Every fiduciary investment company in which a trust institution or foreign trust institution is authorized by this part to own and hold corporate stock or shares, in order to qualify for such investments, shall have such corporate powers as may be granted by Chapter 2 of Title 14 by virtue of its incorporation under those chapters and shall, in addition, have the following corporate powers under its articles of incorporation and, by its articles of incorporation or its bylaws, be subject to the limitations and restrictions set forth in this Code section:

The stock of any such fiduciary investment company shall be owned and held only by trust institutions and foreign trust institutions acting as fiduciaries or cofiduciaries but may be registered in the name of the nominee or nominees of any such trust institution or foreign trust institution. Such stock shall not be subject to transfer or assignment except to the trust institution or foreign trust institution on whose behalf the stock is held by any such nominee or nominees or to a fiduciary or cofiduciary which becomes successor to the shareholder and which is also a trust institution or foreign trust institution qualified to hold such stock.

A fiduciary investment company shall have no less than five directors, who need not be shareholders but shall be officers or directors of trust institutions or foreign trust institutions holding stock in such fiduciary investment company; provided, however, that no more than two directors shall be officers or directors of any one trust institution or foreign trust institution if the fiduciary investment company has been organized and incorporated by three or more trust institutions.

In acquiring, investing, reinvesting, exchanging, selling, and managing its assets, every fiduciary investment company shall exercise the judgment and care under the circumstances then existing which men of prudence, discretion, and intelligence exercise in the management of their own affairs, not in regard to speculation but in regard to the permanent disposition of their funds, considering the probable income as well as the safety of their capital. Within the foregoing limitations, a fiduciary investment company may acquire and retain every kind of investment, specifically including (but not by way of limitation) bonds, debentures, and other corporate obligations and corporate stocks, preferred or common, which men of prudence, discretion, and intelligence acquire or retain for their own account, provided that a fiduciary investment company shall not at any time:

Invest in real estate, commodities, or commodity contracts;

Participate on a joint or joint and several basis in any securities trading account;

Invest in companies for the purpose of exercising control or management;

Make loans to any person or persons, except that the purchase of a portion of an issue of debt securities, convertible debt securities, debt securities with warrants, rights, or options attached, or other similar securities when originally issued or thereafter, of a character commonly distributed publicly, shall not be considered the making of a loan;

Purchase or retain the securities of any issuer if immediately after such acquisition and as a result thereof the following requirements would not be met: at least 75 percent of the total assets in the fiduciary investment company taken at market value are represented by cash and cash items, securities issued or guaranteed by the United States or an instrumentality thereof, and other securities which, as to any one issuer, do not represent more than 10 percent of the value of the total assets of the fiduciary investment company;

Purchase or otherwise acquire the securities of any other investment company as that term is defined in the act of Congress entitled “Investment Company Act of 1940”;

Act as underwriter of the securities of other issuers;

Borrow money; or

A fiduciary investment company may acquire, purchase, or redeem its own stock and may, by means of contract or by its bylaws, bind itself to acquire, purchase, or redeem its own stock; but it shall not vote shares of its own stock theretofore redeemed.

A fiduciary investment company shall not be responsible for ascertaining the investment powers of any fiduciary who may purchase its stock, shall not be liable for accepting funds from a fiduciary in violation of restrictions of the will, trust indenture, or other instrument under which such fiduciary is acting in absence of actual knowledge of such violation, and shall be accountable only to the department and the fiduciaries who are the owners of its stock.

Every fiduciary investment company subject to the supervision and regulation of the comptroller of the currency of the United States shall comply with all applicable rules and regulations of that agency to the extent that such rules and regulations are in addition to or in conflict with rules and regulations promulgated by the department.

Engage in margin transactions or short sales or write put or call options for the purchase or sale of securities.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 515, § 5; Ga. L. 1971, p. 639, § 5; Ga. L. 1973, p. 549, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1974, p. 598, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, § 41A-1505, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

U.S. Code.

The Investment Company Act of 1940, referred to in subparagraph (3)(F) of this Code section, is codified as

15 U.S.C. § 80

a-1 et seq.

7-1-335.
Rules and regulations; examinations.

Without limitation on the authority conferred by Article 1 of this chapter, the department shall have authority to adopt and issue reasonable and uniform rules and regulations to govern the conduct and management of all fiduciary investment companies. The department shall not examine fiduciary investment companies subject to regular examination by the comptroller of the currency of the United States or the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System but shall otherwise have full power to examine fiduciary investment companies and enforce laws concerning them as though they were financial institutions.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 515, § 6; Ga. L. 1973, p. 549, § 5; Code 1933, § 41A-1506, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-336.
Advertisement of participation; financial reports.

Except as may be specifically authorized by rule or regulation of the department, no trust institution or foreign trust institution holding stock in a fiduciary investment company may advertise or publicize its participation in such fiduciary investment company, provided that any trust institution or foreign trust institution holding stock in a fiduciary investment company shall furnish the annual or periodic financial reports of such fiduciary investment company, on request, to any person having a beneficial interest therein and the fact of the availability of such material may be given publicity in connection with the promotion of the fiduciary services of such trust institution or foreign trust institution.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 515, § 7; Ga. L. 1971, p. 639, § 6; Code 1933, § 41A-1507, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-337.
Investment advisers.

No person shall serve or act as investment adviser of a fiduciary investment company except pursuant to a written contract which has been approved by the vote of a majority of the outstanding voting securities of such fiduciary investment company and which:

Precisely describes all compensation to be paid thereunder;

Shall continue in effect for a period more than two years from the date of its execution only so long as such continuance is specifically approved at least annually by the board of directors or by vote of a majority of the outstanding voting securities of such company;

Provides, in substance, that it may be terminated at any time, without the payment of any penalty, by the board of directors of such company or by vote of a majority of the outstanding voting securities of such company on not more than 60 days’ written notice to the investment adviser; and

Provides, in substance, for its automatic termination in the event of its assignment by the investment adviser.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 515, § 8; Code 1933, § 41A-1508, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-338.
Prohibition on refusing participation.

No fiduciary investment company shall refuse participation to any trust institution or foreign trust institution, as defined in this part, which is otherwise qualified to engage in a fiduciary investment program.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 515, § 9; Ga. L. 1971, p. 639, § 7; Code 1933, § 41A-1509, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.